Washington statutes.
RCW 39.26.030

State procurement records—Disclosure.

(1) Records related to state procurements are public records subject to disclosure to the extent provided in chapter 42.56 RCW except as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

(2) Bid submissions and bid evaluations are exempt from disclosure until the agency announces the apparent successful bidder.

[ 2012 c 224 s 4.]